src/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON NUM_36ÜTSʼ-PL
+Num:%{front%} NMN_36KATSʼ/ÜTSʼ-PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_KOGÕR
!! kogõr:kogõr
!! * Yaml: __N-kogwr36__
!! derived from 36särgʼ
!        NUM_KOGÕR-SG ;
!        NUM_KOGÕR-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_KOGÕR-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_KOGÕR-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_KOGÕR-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_KOGÕR-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_46SÕBÕR
!! sõbõr:sõbõr
!! * Yaml: __N-swbwr36__
!! derived from 36särgʼ
!        NUM_46SÕBÕR-SG ;
!        NUM_46SÕBÕR-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_46SÕBÕR-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_46SÕBÕR-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_46SÕBÕR-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_46SÕBÕR-PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_37PINI !!= @CODE@ pini:pini
!        NUM_37PINI-SG ;
!        NUM_37PINI-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_37PINI-SG
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_37PINI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_37PINI-PL
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_37PINI-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_37ÕLI !!= @CODE@ õli:õli
!        NUM_37ÕLI-SG ;
!        NUM_37ÕLI-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_37ÕLI-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_37ÕLI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_37ÕLI-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_37ÕLI-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38PUNG
! NUM_38PUNG-SG ;
! NUM_38PUNG-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PUNG-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_38PUNG-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PUNG-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_38PUNG-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38PULLʼ
! NUM_38PULLʼ-SG ;
! NUM_38PULLʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PULLʼ-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_38PULLʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PULLʼ-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_38PULLʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38PAPPʼ
! NUM_38PAPPʼ-SG ;
! NUM_38PAPPʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PAPPʼ-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_38PAPPʼ/REHKʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PAPPʼ-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_38PAPPʼ/REHKʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38REHKʼ
! NUM_38REHKʼ-SG ;
! NUM_38REHKʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38REHKʼ-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_38PAPPʼ/REHKʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38REHKʼ-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_38PAPPʼ/REHKʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38PUUMʼ
! NUM_38PUUMʼ-SG ;
! NUM_38PUUMʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PUUMʼ-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_38PUUMʼ/SÜÜKʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PUUMʼ-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_38PUUMʼ/SÜÜKʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38SÜÜKʼ
! NUM_38SÜÜKʼ-SG ;
! NUM_38SÜÜKʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38SÜÜKʼ-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_38PUUMʼ/SÜÜKʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38SÜÜKʼ-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_38PUUMʼ/SÜÜKʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38HÜTT !!= * @CODE@ hütt:hütt
! NUM_38HÜTT-SG ;
! NUM_38HÜTT-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38HÜTT-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_38HÜTT-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38HÜTT-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_38HÜTT-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38KULD
! NUM_38KULD-SG ;
! NUM_38KULD-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38KULD-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_38KULD-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38KULD-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_38KULD-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_38PUTR
! NUM_38PUTR-SG ;
! NUM_38PUTR-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PUTR-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_38PUTR-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_38PUTR-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_38PUTR-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_39VIDO !!= * @CODE@ vido:vido
!        NUM_39VIDO-SG ;
!        NUM_39VIDO-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_39VIDO-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_39VIDO-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_39VIDO-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_39VIDO-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_39HÄBÜ !!= * @CODE@ häbü:häbü
!        NUM_39HÄBÜ-SG ;
!        NUM_39HÄBÜ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_39HÄBÜ-SG
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_39HÄBÜ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_39HÄBÜ-PL
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_39HÄBÜ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_40TALO !!= @CODE@ talo:talo
!        NUM_40TALO-SG ;
!        NUM_40TALO-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_40TALO-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_40TALO/HELÜ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_40TALO-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_40TALO/HELÜ-PL ;!
!
!LEXICON NUM_40HELÜ !!= @CODE@ helü:helü
!        NUM_40HELÜ-SG ;
!        NUM_40HELÜ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_40HELÜ-SG
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_40TALO/HELÜ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_40HELÜ-PL
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_40TALO/HELÜ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_40UJA !!= @CODE@ uja:uja
!        NUM_40UJA-SG ;
!        NUM_40UJA-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_40UJA-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_40UJA/XX-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_40UJA-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_40UJA/XX-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_41KAND !!= @CODE@ kand:kand
!! * Yaml: __aig, kand__
!        NUM_41KAND-SG ;
!        NUM_41KAND-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_41KAND-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_41KAND-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_41KAND-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_41KAND-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_41JUHTʼ !!= @CODE@ juhtʼ:juht
!! * Yaml: __juhtʼ__
!        NUM_41JUHTʼ-SG ;
!	N_41JUHTʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_41JUHTʼ-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_41JUHTʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_41JUHTʼ-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_41JUHTʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_41AIG !!= @CODE@ aig:aig
!! * Yaml: __aig, aig__
!        NUM_41AIG-SG ;
!	N_41AIG-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_41AIG-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_41AIG-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_41AIG-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_41AIG-PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_42VARI
!        NUM_42VARI-SG ;
!        NUM_42VARI-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_42VARI-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_42VARI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_42VARI-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_42VARI-PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_43KANARIK !!= @CODE@
!        NUM_43KANARIK-SG ;
!        NUM_43KANARIK-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_43KANARIK-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_43KANARIK-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_43KANARIK-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_43KANARIK-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_43SASLÕKʼ !!= @CODE@
!        NUM_43SASLÕKʼ-SG ;
!        NUM_43SASLÕKʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_43SASLÕKʼ-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_43SASLÕKʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_43SASLÕKʼ-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_43SASLÕKʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_43AASTAK !!= @CODE@
!        NUM_43AASTAK-SG ;
!        NUM_43AASTAK-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_43AASTAK-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_43AASTAK-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_43AASTAK-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_43AASTAK-PL ;



LEXICON NUM_44SÕDA !!= @CODE@ sõda:sõda
        NUM_44SÕDA-SG ;
	NUM_44SÕDA-PL ;
LEXICON NUM_44SÕDA-SG
+Num:%{back%}     NMN_44SÕDA-SG ;
LEXICON NUM_44SÕDA-PL
+Num:%{back%}     NMN_44SÕDA-PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_45KANA !!= @CODE@ kana:kana
!        NUM_45KANA-SG ;
!	NUM_45KANA-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_45KANA-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_45KANA/RIHÄ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_45KANA-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_45KANA/RIHÄ-PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_46HAIN !!= @CODE@ hain:hain
!! * Yaml: __N-jalg, N-hain__
!        NUM_46HAIN-SG ;
!        NUM_46HAIN-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_46HAIN-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_46HAIN-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_46HAIN-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_46HAIN-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_46TARK !!= @CODE@ tark:tark
!! * Yaml: __N-jalg, N-tark__
!        NUM_46TARK-SG ;
!        NUM_46TARK-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_46TARK-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_46TARK-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_46TARK-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_46TARK-PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_47ASI !!= @CODE@ asi:asi
!        NUM_47ASI-SG ;
!        NUM_47ASI-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_47ASI-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_47ASI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_47ASI-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_47ASI-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_47KIRI !!= @CODE@ kiri:kiri
!        NUM_47KIRI-SG ;
!        NUM_47KIRI-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_47KIRI-SG
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_47KIRI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_47KIRI-PL
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_47KIRI-PL ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
